Maryland, session 2025, HB1242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The State Department of Education, in collaboration with the Maryland
Department of Health, shall convene a workgroup that includes representatives of:
(1) county boards of education;
(2) local health departments;
(3) the Maryland Optometric Association;
(4) the Maryland Society of Eye Physicians & Surgeons;
(5) Vision for Baltimore; and
(6) any other relevant State and local vision service providers, such as
public libraries that host eye exams and eyeglasses distribution events.
(b) The workgroup shall:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1242*

HOUSE BILL 1242
(1) study:
(i) the jurisdictional incidence and prevalence of:
1. primary and secondary students who fail vision screening
tests and the percentage of students who:
A. received the recommended follow–up comprehensive
vision testing, eyeglasses, or other vision support treatments or services to correct the
vision deficiency;
B. received the recommended follow–up comprehensive
vision testing but have not received recommended eyeglasses or other vision support
treatments or other services to correct the vision deficiency; and
C. did not obtain the recommended follow–up comprehensive
vision testing;
2. the correlation between having insurance coverage and
whether primary and secondary students receive recommended comprehensive vision
testing, eyeglasses, and other vision support treatments or services; and
3. other factors that contribute to primary and secondary
students not receiving the vision support treatments and services necessary for the
students to be visually equipped to learn;
(ii) the policies and programs each jurisdiction uses to identify
children who have or have not received recommended vision support treatments or services;
(iii) for each jurisdiction, the resources available for ensuring that
vision deficits are adequately addressed and primary and secondary students are visually
equipped to learn, including:
1. civic, nonprofit, and public organizations that provide
vision screening tests;
2. vouchers for purchasing eyeglasses;
3. prescription eyeglasses donations; and
4. local eye care professionals who provide pro bono or
discounted services or supplies to members of the community;
(iv) the role and responsibilities of the local public health department
and school system in tracking and ensuring primary and secondary students are visually
equipped to learn, including the mechanisms and programs used to achieve that goal;

HOUSE BILL 1242 3
(v) programs and policies in other states and local jurisdictions that
give priority to ensuring that school children are visually equipped to learn, including
funding options such as:
1. insurance;
2. third–party cost coverage;
3. grants;
4. philanthropy; and
5. public funding; and
(vi) other factors the workgroup considers necessary to ensure all
primary and secondary students are visually equipped to learn; and
(2) evaluate and make recommendations regarding:
(i) whether additional mandatory school vision screening tests are
necessary and, if so, how the additional tests might be funded;
(ii) to better identify and track whether students are receiving
recommended eye exams and other vision support treatments and services, the feasibility
and benefits of developing a mechanism to facilitate reporting eye exam findings to the local
school system or public health department in a manner that is similar to how eye exam
results are reported to the Motor Vehicle Administration;
(iii) how to better educate families about the importance of
diagnosing and treating vision deficits;
(iv) how to better partner with community eye professionals to
address the needs of the community;
(v) the feasibility and necessity of a vision support program that:
1. would identify and assist only primary and secondary
students who have vision needs and are:
A. being missed under the current system; or
B. identified under the current system but are not receiving
the necessary vision support treatments and services;
2. would not provide vision screening tests, eye exams, or
other vision support treatments and services to all primary and secondary students;

HOUSE BILL 1242
3. would connect students identified by the program to:
A. local vision service providers for ongoing and long–term
care;
B. insurance benefits; and
C. philanthropic resources; and
4. would emphasize education and increased awareness
around vision needs and services;
(vi) how the State can assist local jurisdictions to ensure all students
are visually equipped to learn;
(vii) annual funding levels for vision support programs and options
for sustaining the funding; and
(viii) how a vision support program would give priority to:
1. referring primary and secondary students initially
identified and treated through the program to community providers for their ongoing and
long–term vision support needs;
2. partnering with community providers to provide primary
and secondary students with initial vision assessments and treatments and long–term care;
and
3. ensuring vision support treatment and services are
provided to primary and secondary students regardless of insurance status, with
consideration given to whether insurance companies can provide annual contributions,
capitation, or other methods to underwrite the cost of the programs either in part or in
whole.
(c) A member of the workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(d) On or before December 31, 2026, the workgroup shall submit a report of its
findings and recommendations, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, to:
(1) the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and the Environment;

HOUSE BILL 1242 5
(2) the Education, Business and Administration Subcommittee of the
Senate Budget and Taxation Committee;
(3) the House Health and Government Operations Committee;
(4) the House Ways and Means Committee; and
(5) the Education and Economic Development Subcommittee of the House
Appropriations Committee.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Maryland State School Health Council shall evaluate:
(1) how the Council can partner with interested parties to address issues
that may arise when primary and secondary students are inadequately equipped to learn
due to vision or hearing difficulties;
(2) the number of school primary and secondary students with hearing
difficulties who have not received the auditory aids necessary for them to learn; and
(3) whether statutory support programs similar to programs studied under
Section 1 of this Act would assist public school primary and secondary students who have
hearing difficulties.
(b) On or before December 31, 2026, the Maryland State School Health Council
shall submit a report of its findings, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, to:
(1) the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and the Environment;
(2) the Education, Business and Administration Subcommittee of the
Senate Budget and Taxation Committee;
(3) the House Health and Government Operations Committee;
(4) the House Ways and Means Committee; and
(5) the Education and Economic Development Subcommittee of the House
Appropriations Committee.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the end of June 30, 2027,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.